arb-verbs-lexc.txt
^ss^أقبل^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^أقر^se^^dbl3^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@				Transitive;
^ss^أقسم^se^@D.V.P@							Transitive;
^ss^أقصى^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^أقفل^se^@D.M.I@							Intransitive;
^ss^أقل^se^^dbl3^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@				Transitive;
^ss^أقلع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^أقلق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^أقنع^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^أكد^se^^dbl2^dbl@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^أكرم^se^								Transitive;
^ss^أكل^se^									Transitive;
^ss^أكمل^se^								Transitive;
^ss^ألحق^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^ألزم^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^ألغى^se^								Transitive;
^ss^ألقى^se^								Transitive;
^ss^ألم^se^^dbl3^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@				Intransitive;
^ss^ألمح^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^أمد^se^^dbl3^dbl@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^أمر^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^أمر^se^^dbl2^dbl@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^أمسك^se^								Transitive;
^ss^أمضى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^أمكن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^أمل^se^@D.M.I@							Intransitive;
^ss^أملى^se^								Transitive;
^ss^أمن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^أمهل^se^								Transitive;
^ss^أنتج^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^أنجز^se^								Transitive;
^ss^أنحى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^أنذر^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^أنزل^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^أنشأ^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^أنصف^se^								Transitive;
^ss^أنعم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^أنفق^se^								Transitive;
^ss^أنقذ^se^									Transitive;
^ss^أنكر^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^أنهى^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^أهم^se^^dbl3^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@				Transitive;
^ss^أوجد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^أوحى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^أودع^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^أودى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^أورد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^أورق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^أوشك^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^أوصى^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^أوضح^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^أوفد^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^أوفى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^أوقع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^أوقف^se^								Transitive;
^ss^أول^se^^dbl2^dbl@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^أولى^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^أومأ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^أوى^se^^origي^orig@D.V.P@@D.M.I@			Intransitive;
^ss^أيد^se^^dbl2^dbl@D.V.P@					Transitive;
^ss^أيقظ^se^@D.V.P@							Transitive;
^ss^أيقن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^أينع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^ابتعد^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^ابتكر^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^ابتلع^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^اتبع^se^^dbl2^dbl@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^اتجه^se^^dbl2^dbl@D.V.P@					Intransitive;
^ss^اتحد^se^^dbl2^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@				Intransitive;
^ss^اتخذ^se^^dbl2^dbl							Transitive;
^ss^اتسع^se^^dbl2^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@				Intransitive;
^ss^اتسم^se^^dbl2^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@				Intransitive;
^ss^اتصل^se^^dbl2^dbl@D.V.P@					Intransitive;
^ss^اتضح^se^^dbl2^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@			Intransitive;
^ss^اتفق^se^^dbl2^dbl@D.V.P@					Intransitive;
^ss^اتهم^se^^dbl2^dbl@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^اثني^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اجتاح^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^اجتمع^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^احتاج^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^احتج^se^^dbl4^dbl@D.V.P@					Intransitive;
^ss^احتجز^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^احتدم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^احتذى^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^احترق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^احترم^se^								Transitive;
^ss^احتشد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^احتضن^se^@D.M.I@						Transitive;
^ss^احتفظ^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^احتفل^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^احتل^se^^dbl4^dbl@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^احتمل^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^احتوى^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^اختار^se^								Transitive;
^ss^اختبأ^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^اختبر^se^								Transitive;
^ss^اختتم^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^اخترق^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^اختص^se^^dbl4^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@			Intransitive;
^ss^اختصر^se^								Transitive;
^ss^اختطف^se^@D.M.I@						Transitive;
^ss^اختفى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اختلط^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اختلف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^ادعى^se^^dbl2^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@				Intransitive;
^ss^ارتاد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^ارتبط^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^ارتدى^se^								Transitive;
^ss^ارتطم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^ارتفع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^ارتكب^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^ارتكز^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^ازداد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^استأنف^se^								Transitive;
^ss^استبدل^se^								Transitive;
^ss^استبعد^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^استبق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^استثنى^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^استجاب^se^@D.M.I@						Intransitive;
^ss^استجدى^se^@D.M.I@						Transitive;
^ss^استجوب^se^@D.M.I@						Transitive;
^ss^استحال^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^استحق^se^^dbl5^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@			Transitive;
^ss^استحوذ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^استخدم^se^								Transitive;
^ss^استخرج^se^								Transitive;
^ss^استخف^se^^dbl4^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@			Intransitive;
^ss^استدرك^se^@D.M.I@						Transitive;
^ss^استدعى^se^@D.M.I@						Transitive;
^ss^استسلم^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^استشار^se^								Transitive;
^ss^استشهد^se^@D.V.P@						Intransitive;
^ss^استضاف^se^@D.M.I@						Transitive;
^ss^استطاع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^استطرد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^استطلع^se^								Transitive;
^ss^استعاد^se^								Transitive;
^ss^استعان^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^استعد^se^^dbl5^dbl@D.V.P@					Intransitive;
^ss^استعرض^se^@D.M.I@						Transitive;
^ss^استعمل^se^								Transitive;
^ss^استغرب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^استغرق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^استغفر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^استغل^se^^dbl5^dbl							Transitive;
^ss^استفاد^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^استقال^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^استقبل^se^								Transitive;
^ss^استقر^se^^dbl5^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@			Intransitive;
^ss^استقل^se^^dbl5^dbl@D.V.P@@U.SENSE.1@		Transitive;
^ss^استقل^se^^dbl5^dbl@D.V.P@@U.SENSE.2@		Intransitive;
^ss^استكمل^se^								Transitive;
^ss^استلزم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^استلم^se^								Transitive;
^ss^استمد^se^^dbl5^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@				Intransitive;
^ss^استمر^se^^dbl5^dbl@D.V.P@					Intransitive;
^ss^استمع^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^استنجد^se^@D.V.P@						Intransitive;
^ss^استند^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^استنكر^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^استهان^se^@D.M.I@							Intransitive;
^ss^استهدف^se^@D.M.I@						Transitive;
^ss^استهل^se^^dbl5^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@			Transitive;
^ss^استوجب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^استورد^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^استوفى^se^@D.M.I@						Transitive;
^ss^استولى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اشتبك^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اشتبه^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اشتد^se^^dbl4^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@				Intransitive;
^ss^اشترط^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اشترك^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^اشترى^se^								Transitive;
^ss^اشتعل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اشتكى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اشتمل^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^اشتهر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اصطدم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اضطر^se^^dbl4^dbl@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^اضطلع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اطلع^se^^dbl2^dbl@D.V.P@					Intransitive;
^ss^اطمأن^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^اعتاد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اعتبر^se^								Transitive;
^ss^اعتدى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اعتذر^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^اعترض^se^@D.V.P@						Intransitive;
^ss^اعترف^se^@D.V.P@						Intransitive;
^ss^اعتزم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^اعتصم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اعتقد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اعتقل^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^اعتلى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اعتمد^se^@U.SENSE.1@						Transitive;
^ss^اعتمد^se^@U.SENSE.2@						Intransitive;
^ss^اعتنق^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^اغتال^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^افتتح^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^افترض^se^@D.V.P@						Intransitive;
^ss^افتقد^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^افتقر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اقتاد^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^اقتحم^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^اقترب^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^اقترح^se^								Transitive;
^ss^اقترع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اقترف^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^اقتصر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اقتضى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اقتطع^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^اقتنع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اكتسب^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^اكتشف^se^								Transitive;
^ss^اكتظ^se^^dbl4^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@				Intransitive;
^ss^اكتفى^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^اكتمل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اكتنف^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^التأم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^التحق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^التزم^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^التف^se^^dbl3^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@				Intransitive;
^ss^التقط^se^								Transitive;
^ss^التقى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Transitive;
^ss^التهم^se^								Transitive;
^ss^امتاز^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^امتحن^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^امتد^se^^dbl4^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@				Intransitive;
^ss^امتدح^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^امتلأ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^امتلك^se^								Transitive;
^ss^امتنع^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^انبثق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انبغى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انتحر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انتخب^se^								Transitive;
^ss^انتزع^se^								Transitive;
^ss^انتشر^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^انتشل^se^								Transitive;
^ss^انتصر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انتظر^se^								Transitive;
^ss^انتقد^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^انتقل^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^انتمى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انتهج^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^انتهك^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^انتهى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انحاز^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انحدر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انحصر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انحنى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انخرط^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انخفض^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اندرج^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اندفع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اندلع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انسجم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انسحب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انشغل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انشق^se^^dbl4^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@				Intransitive;
^ss^انصب^se^^dbl4^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@			Intransitive;
^ss^انصت^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^انضم^se^^dbl4^dbl@D.V.P@					Intransitive;
^ss^انطبق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انطلق^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^انطوى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انعقد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انعكس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انفجر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انفصل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انقسم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انقطع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انقلب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انهار^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^انهزم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@					Intransitive;
^ss^اهتز^se^^dbl4^dbl@D.V.P@@D.M.I@				Intransitive;
^ss^اهتم^se^^dbl4^dbl@D.V.P@					Intransitive;
^ss^باء^se^^origو^orig@D.V.P@@D.M.I@				Intransitive;
^ss^بات^se^^origي^orig@D.V.P@@D.M.I@			Intransitive;
^ss^بادر^se^@D.V.P@							Intransitive;
^ss^بادر^se^@D.V.P@							Transitive;
^ss^بارك^se^@D.M.I@							Transitive;
^ss^باشر^se^								Transitive;
^ss^باع^se^^origي^orig							Transitive;
